Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201979-727
Rules and regulations; State Department of Education; duties.

The State Board of Education shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of sections 79-724 to 79-726. The State Department of Education shall ensure that all requirements of such sections and such rules and regulations are carried out by each school district.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 401;

Laws 2019, LB399, § 2.
September 1, 2019